Georgia statutes. 
History

(Ga. L. 1947, p. 1173, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 961, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 400, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1461, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 334, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 338, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 36; Ga. L. 2010, p. 404, § 2/SB 369.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Authorized investments of counties, municipalities, and other entities, generally, § 36-83-4.

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, a comma was inserted following the second "authority" in the introductory language.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Use of bond money to buy bonds approved when insufficient to build project. - County board of education does not abuse the board's discretion, when the board determines that it would be impossible to build a schoolhouse with the amount of bond money on hand, in using the money to buy more bonds. Williams v. Ragsdale, 205 Ga. 274, 53 S.E.2d 339 (1949).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 109.

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2167.

ALR. - Constitutionality, construction, and application of statute empowering municipal corporation to issue bonds the proceeds of which shall be invested in municipal securities, 108 A.L.R. 736.

36-82-7.1. Assessment and collection of tax to pay refunding bonds.

Statute text

Any county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state shall at or before the issuance and delivery of any general obligation refunding bonds provide for the assessment and collection of an annual tax sufficient in amount to pay the principal and interest on such refunding bonds as same become due and payable, all as is provided in Article IX, Section V, Paragraph VI of the Constitution of Georgia.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-7.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1362, § 4.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1984, p. 1362, § 8, not codified by the General Assembly, provided as follows: "The provisions of this Act [which enacted this Code section] shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof, and insofar as the provisions of this Act may be inconsistent with the provisions of the Georgia Constitution under circumstances where the General Assembly has been granted the power by law to enlarge or restrict such provisions of the Constitution or the provisions of any law, including any general, local, or special Act of the General Assembly creating or activating any municipality, this Act shall control."

36-82-8. Deduction of sinking fund in computing bonded indebtedness.

Statute text

All amounts collected and held in a sinking fund pursuant to Article IX, Section V, Paragraph VI of the Constitution of Georgia, irrevocably pledged and appropriated to the retirement of the outstanding bonded indebtedness for which they are collected, which can be legally used for no other purpose, shall be deductible from total bonded debt in computing the constitutional limitation on the bonded indebtedness of a political subdivision of this state under Article IX, Section VII of the Constitution of Georgia.

History

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 203, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 57.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, §§ 5, 6.

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2184 et seq.

ALR. - Liability of officer for loss of sinking fund through failure of bank, 25 A.L.R. 1358.

Constitutional provisions against impairment of obligations of contract as applied to sinking funds for retirement of municipal or other public bonds, 115 A.L.R. 220.

36-82-9. Certification requirement for pension obligation bonds; requirement for reserve fund.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term:

(1) "Annual savings" means the difference between the annual debt service payments on pension obligation bonds and the annual required contribution to fund the unfunded actuarial accrued liability of the pension fund.

(2) "Level debt structure" means the establishment of a bond repayment schedule that requires equal annual debt service payments, including both principal and interest, over the life of the debt issue.

(3) "Pension obligation bond" means a bond issued as a general obligation bond in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the proceeds of which are deposited with the government's retirement system administrator to liquidate, in whole or in part, the government's unfunded accrued actuarial liability to the government's retirement plan.

(b) No political subdivision shall issue any pension obligation bond unless the state auditor has certified that such bonds comply fully with the provisions of this Code section.

(c) All pension obligation bonds shall:

(1) Be general obligation bonds subject to the provisions of the Constitution of the State of Georgia and this chapter relating to general obligation bonds;

(2) Be included as a component of the total debt of the political subdivision subject to the debt limits provided in Article IX, Section V of the Constitution of the State of Georgia;

(3) Be issued on a competitive basis;

(4) Specify a level debt structure; and

(5) Specify a maturity not longer than 20 years.

(d) An amount not less than 5 percent of the annual savings shall be deposited into a reserve fund as protection against changes that might impact the future financial condition of the pension system.

(e) Neither the political subdivision issuing pension obligation bonds nor any department, agency, authority, retirement system, or pension fund of such political subdivision shall purchase the pension obligation bonds so issued.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-9, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 810, § 1.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2001, Code Section 36-82-9, as enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 1033, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 36-82-10.

Law reviews. - For article, "Local Government Law," see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

For note on the 2001 enactment of this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 193 (2001).

36-82-10. Reporting requirements.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term "political subdivision" means any municipality, county, local government authority, board, or commission empowered to enter into debt. Such term shall not include any state agency or state authority.

(b) A political subdivision which issues general obligation bonds, revenue bonds, or any other bonds, notes, certificates of participation, or other such obligations of that political subdivision in an amount exceeding $1 million shall file a report with the Department of Community Affairs which contains the following:

(1) Name of issuer;

(2) Whether the issue is a new issue or a refinancing or refunding;

(3) Total amount issued;

(4) Term of issue;

(5) Detailed description of purpose or purposes;

(5.1) Whether the issue is a general obligation bond, revenue bond, or other bond, note, certificate of participation, or other obligation;

(6) Name of underwriter;

(7) Proceeds used for bond issuance costs, including underwriters' discount as reported on Line 24 of the United States Department of Treasury's Internal Revenue Service Form 8038-G;

(8) Name of bond counsel;

(9) Interest rate; and

(10) True or net interest costs.

Such information shall be reported to the Department of Community Affairs in accordance with Code Section 36-81-8.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-82-10, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 1033, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 1021, § 1/HB 1012; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 36/HB 942.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2001, Code Section 36-82-9, as enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 1033, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 36-82-10.

——————————

ARTICLE 2

VALIDATION OF BONDS

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Duties of superior court judge set forth. - Under the provisions of this article, a superior court judge's duties are simply to hear and determine all questions of law and fact in a proceeding brought by the solicitor general (now district attorney) in the name of the state and against the county or municipality or political subdivision to validate their proposed bonds. In such a proceeding the sole issue is whether the proceeding by the county or municipality or other political subdivision for the issuance of such bond was legal, that is, whether all the provisions of the law have been complied with. Clinkscales v. State, 102 Ga. App. 670, 117 S.E.2d 229 (1960).

Cited in Posey v. Dooly County Sch. Dist., 215 Ga. 712, 113 S.E.2d 120 (1960); Johnson v. State, 107 Ga. App. 16, 128 S.E.2d 651 (1962).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Constitutionality, construction, application, and effect of statute requiring judicial approval before issuance or sale of municipal or county bonds or obligations, 87 A.L.R. 706; 102 A.L.R. 90.

Printing, lithographing, or other mechanical signature on public bonds, coupons, or other public pecuniary obligation, 94 A.L.R. 768.

——————————

PART 1

GENERAL PROVISIONS

36-82-20. Notice to district attorney or Attorney General of election or resolution favoring issuance of bonds or refunding bonds.

Statute text

(a) When any county, municipality, or political subdivision desiring to incur any bonded debt, as prescribed in Article IX, Section V, Paragraphs I and II of the Constitution of Georgia, holds an election or passes a resolution in accordance with the provisions of the Constitution and laws of this state controlling and regulating such elections or the passage of such resolutions and the returns of such election or resolution show prima facie that the election or resolution is in favor of the issuance of the bonds, the officer or officers of the county, municipality, or political subdivision charged by law with the duty of declaring the result of the election or resolution, within six months after so declaring the result of the election or of the passage of the resolution, shall notify the district attorney of the judicial circuit in which the county, municipality, or political subdivision is located, in writing, of the fact that an election was held or that a resolution was passed and that the election or resolution was in favor of the issuance of the bonds. The service of the notice shall be personal upon the district attorney; in the event that he is absent from the circuit, the notice shall be served in person upon the Attorney General.

(b) It is expressly provided that when the governing body of any county, municipality, or political subdivision desiring to issue refunding bonds as provided by Article IX, Section V, Paragraph III of the Constitution of Georgia shall have adopted a resolution or ordinance authorizing the issuance of refunding bonds, the proper officer or officers of such county, municipality, or political subdivision, within six months after the adoption of such resolution or ordinance authorizing the issuance of such refunding bonds, shall notify the district attorney of the judicial circuit in which such county, municipality, or political subdivision is located, in writing, of the fact that the requirements pertaining to the issuance of general obligation refunding bonds have been met and that the issuance of such refunding bonds has been authorized by a resolution or ordinance duly adopted by the governing body of such county, municipality, or political subdivision and shall furnish the district attorney with a certified copy of such resolution or ordinance authorizing the issuance of such refunding bonds. The service of such notice shall be personal upon the district attorney; in the event that he is absent from the circuit, the notice shall be served in person upon the Attorney General.

History

(Ga. L. 1897, p. 82, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 445; Ga. L. 1920, p. 63, § 1; Code 1933, § 87-301; Ga. L. 1946, p. 80, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 168, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 57; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1362, § 5.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1984, p. 1362, § 8, not codified by the General Assembly, provided: "The provisions of this Act [which amended this Code section] shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof, and insofar as the provisions of this Act may be inconsistent with the provisions of the Georgia Constitution under circumstances where the General Assembly has been granted the power by law to enlarge or restrict such provisions of the Constitution or the provisions of any law, including any general, local, or special Act of the General Assembly creating or activating any municipality, this Act shall control."

Law reviews. - For article discussing the impact on bond issues of challenges to voting procedures, see 15 Ga. St. B. J. 15 (1978).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

This section is not unconstitutional on the ground that it makes no provision for a trial by jury in reference to the matters for the investigation of which provision is therein made. Lippitt v. City of Albany, 131 Ga. 629, 63 S.E. 33 (1908).

This section is not unconstitutional on the grounds that the statute deprives citizens of property without due process of law by excluding further investigation as to validity of the bonds after judgment of confirmation and validation. Lippitt v. City of Albany, 131 Ga. 629, 63 S.E. 33 (1908).

This section does not violate Ga. Const. 1877, Art. VII, Sec. VII, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. V, Para. I), as there is no merit in the contention that the statute seeks to confer power to incur debts without the consent of two-thirds (now majority) of the voters by the authorizing of confirmation bonds which have not received the required vote. Lippitt v. City of Albany, 131 Ga. 629, 63 S.E. 33 (1908).

Limited unconstitutionality. - Insofar as former Civil Code 1910, § 445 et seq. (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-82-20 et seq.), authorized the judge of the superior court to hear and determine the proceeding in a county other than that so fixed by the Constitution, the statute was invalid and must yield to the constitutional requirement on that subject. Ray v. City of Lavonia, 141 Ga. 626, 81 S.E. 884 (1914).

Constitutionality - When the constitutionality of former Civil Code 1910, § 445 et seq. (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-82-20 et seq.) was not raised in a lower court, it was not considered in the Supreme Court. Edwards v. Town of Guyton, 140 Ga. 553, 79 S.E. 195 (1913).

Purpose of section. - Purpose of this section is to provide a method by which it should be judicially investigated and determined whether the law, constitutional and statutory, has been complied with, so as to declare bonds referred to therein valid before their issuance. Lippitt v. City of Albany, 131 Ga. 629, 63 S.E. 33 (1908).

Provisions of this section are mandatory and must be strictly complied with. State v. Chatham County, 103 Ga. App. 390, 119 S.E.2d 120 (1961).

Validation upon substantial compliance. - When the record discloses the fact that all the requirements in relation to notice and providing for an election to determine whether bonds should be issued were either literally or substantially complied with, judgment validating such bonds is affirmed. Wimberly v. County of Twiggs, 116 Ga. 50, 42 S.E. 478 (1902).

Absence of payment provision. - It is not incumbent upon the court to inquire into the question as to whether provision for payment has been made in conformity with the requirements of the Constitution. The bonds are not to be issued until after they are validated. If nothing appears as to what provision is to be made with reference to payment of the bonds, it will be presumed that if provision has not already been made it will be made in accordance with the Constitution and laws. Wilkins v. City of Waynesboro, 116 Ga. 359, 42 S.E. 767 (1902); Oliver v. City of Elberton, 124 Ga. 64, 52 S.E. 15 (1905).

No validation if payment unlawful. - If when the application is made to validate the issue of bonds it appears to the judge, either from the pleadings or otherwise, that the authorities of the municipality or county do not intend to make provision for the payment of the bonds in the manner required by the Constitution, the judge should not render a judgment validating the issue of bonds. Wilkins v. City of Waynesboro, 116 Ga. 359, 42 S.E. 767 (1902); Oliver v. City of Elberton, 124 Ga. 64, 52 S.E. 15 (1905).

Notice should be served as required by statute. - Notice which this section requires to be given to the solicitor general (now district attorney) by the officers charged by law with the duty of declaring the result of an election held by any county, municipality, or division for the purpose of incurring any bonded indebtedness as therein provided, must be served upon the solicitor general (now district attorney) in the manner therein prescribed and within the time therein specified, and should notify the solicitor general (now district attorney) that an election for the issuance of bonds was held in the county, municipality, or division, and that the election was in favor of the issuance of such bonds; and it is not necessary to the validity of such notice that a copy of the resolution authorizing the election be incorporated in the notice or attached thereto. Rich v. Brinson Consol. Sch. Dist., 28 Ga. App. 530, 112 S.E. 164, cert. denied, 28 Ga. App. 819 (1922).

When notice properly served, bonds should be validated. - When a notice of an election held for the purpose of incurring a bonded indebtedness was properly served upon the solicitor general (now district attorney) and gave to that officer the necessary notice required by law, and had attached thereto what purported to be a true and correct copy of the resolution passed by the proper authorities ordering the election, and which copy was referred to in the notice given to the solicitor general (now district attorney), it was not error, upon the hearing of an intervention to the proceeding to validate the bonds authorized by the election, for the trial judge, over the objection of the intervenors, to allow the officers giving the notice to amend the notice by withdrawing or striking the attached copy of the resolution authorizing the election and substituting in lieu thereof another copy, alleged to be a true and correct copy of the resolution authorizing the election. Rich v. Brinson Consol. Sch. Dist., 28 Ga. App. 530, 112 S.E. 164, cert. denied, 28 Ga. App. 819 (1922).

Single proceeding may be had to validate several series of bonds. - When there are three series of bonds to be issued, each for a separate purpose, a single proceeding may be maintained to validate the bonds, the items being submitted separately. Sewell v. City of Tallapoosa, 145 Ga. 19, 88 S.E. 577 (1916).

Bonds may be valid notwithstanding refusal to validate. - Judgment refusing to validate bonds not being based on the invalidity of the bonds is not the equivalent of a judgment declaring the bonds illegal. Bonds may be valid and binding notwithstanding a refusal of the court to confirm and validate. Tyson v. McIntosh County, 147 Ga. 233, 93 S.E. 407 (1917); Harrell v. Whigham, 147 Ga. 558, 94 S.E. 994 (1918).

Fact that judgment of validation void has no effect on bonds legally issued. - Even if the proceedings to validate bonds were void, the sale of the bonds issued in conformity with former Civil Code 1910, § 441 et seq. (see O.C.G.A. §§ 36-82-2 et seq. and 36-82-20), would not be enjoined merely because the judgment of validation was void. Durrence v. City of Statesboro, 147 Ga. 175, 93 S.E. 88 (1917); Tyson v. McIntosh County, 147 Ga. 233, 93 S.E. 407 (1917).

Extent of power of superior court. - In a proceeding to validate bonds, it is within the power and jurisdiction of the superior court upon proper pleadings and sufficient evidence, to pass upon the validity of any votes cast in the election, and to eliminate such votes as are shown by the pleadings and the evidence to be illegal. King v. County Bd. of Educ., 174 Ga. 685, 164 S.E. 52 (1932).

Unlawful use of bonds. - Fact that the city may intend to use the proceeds of the bonds in an unlawful manner, the bonds being voted for a lawful purpose, is not a ground for refusing to validate. Gracen v. Mayor of Savannah, 142 Ga. 141, 82 S.E. 453 (1914).

Refusal of validation no remedy for unlawful use of proceeds. - If the public authorities should seek to use in an unlawful manner, or for an unlawful purpose, the proceeds of the bonds thus authorized, the remedy is not by a refusal to validate the bonds for the purpose for which the bonds were authorized. Lilly v. Crisp County Sch. Sys., 117 Ga. App. 868, 162 S.E.2d 456 (1968).

Validation not collusive because uncontested. - Validation is not held to be collusive because the validation is uncontested for a complaining citizen has the right to become a party and contest the validation. Farmer v. Mayor of Thomson, 133 Ga. 94, 65 S.E. 180 (1909).

There is no law which would prevent any party to proceeding from introducing evidence which would establish existence of facts necessary to validation of bonds. Lilly v. Crisp County Sch. Sys., 117 Ga. App. 868, 162 S.E.2d 456 (1968).

Rights of taxpayers who failed to make themselves parties. - When an election, held to determine whether municipal bonds should be issued, resulted in favor of such issuance, and the bonds were duly validated in accordance with these provisions, the citizens and taxpayers who could have made themselves parties to the proceedings to validate the bonds, but failed to do so, were concluded by the judgment rendered, and could not thereafter enjoin the collection of a tax to pay the interest and part of the principal falling due, on the ground that some of the bonds were for a purpose not authorized by the Constitution. Jenkins v. Mayor of Savannah, 165 Ga. 121, 139 S.E. 863 (1927).

Sufficiency of petition. - Petition to validate bonds must set forth a strict compliance with the law by: service of the notice required by this section; the name of the political subdivision seeking to issue the bonds; the purpose for which the bonds are to be issued; the principal amount of the bonds; what interest the bonds are to bear, or the maximum per annum rate of interest specified in the election notice; and the amount of principal to be paid annually. Lilly v. Crisp County Sch. Sys., 117 Ga. App. 868, 162 S.E.2d 456 (1968).

Burden of proof in action to validate bonds. - It was incumbent upon the petitioner in an action to validate bonds to make out a prima facie case by proving each of the substantial and material allegations set forth in former Civil Code 1910, §§ 441 and 445 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-82-2 and 36-82-20) as necessary allegations of the petition. When this was done the burden is cast upon the defendant, or upon a proper party as intervenor, to set up and establish any other fact which by aliunde proof would render the bond election invalid. King v. County Bd. of Educ., 42 Ga. App. 563, 156 S.E. 710 (1931), aff'd by operation of law, 174 Ga. 685, 164 S.E. 52 (1932).

Cited in Liner v. City of Rossville, 213 Ga. 756, 101 S.E.2d 753 (1958).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Discussion of the hiring of private law firms by political subdivisions for the purposes of validating and providing opinions as to the legality of state and municipal bonds. 1963-65 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 590.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 352.

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2153 et seq.

ALR. - Estoppel to deny validity of municipal bonds issued under an unconstitutional statute, 37 A.L.R. 1310.

36-82-21. Petition to superior court to show cause; service of petition and order; answers.

Statute text

(a) Within 20 days from the date of the service upon the district attorney or the Attorney General of notice of the fact that an election was held or a resolution passed and that the election or resolution was in favor of the issuance of the bonds, the district attorney or the Attorney General shall prepare and file a petition in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the election was held or the resolution was passed, directed to the superior court of the county, in the name of the state, and against the county, municipality, or political subdivision desiring to issue bonds under the election or resolution. The petition shall set forth the service of the notice, the name of the county, municipality, or political subdivision seeking to issue the bonds, the principal amount of the bonds to be issued, the purpose for which the bonds are issued, the interest rate or rates which the bonds are to bear, and the amount of principal to be paid in each year during the life of the bonds and shall state that the election or resolution is prima facie in favor of the issuance of the bonds. The petition, in lieu of specifying the rate or rates of interest which the bonds are to bear, may set forth the wording which was used with respect to interest in the notice which was published calling the election to authorize the issuance of the bonds. The district attorney or the Attorney General shall obtain, from the judge of the court, an order requiring the county, municipality, or political subdivision, by its proper officers, to appear at such time and place, either in term or at chambers, within 20 days from the filing of the petition, as the judge of the court may direct, and to show cause, if any exists, why the bonds should not be confirmed and validated. The petition and order shall be served in the manner provided by law for the service of petitions upon counties, municipalities, or political subdivisions. The officers of the county, municipality, or political subdivision shall make sworn answers to such petition at or before the date set in the order for the hearing.

(b) Within 20 days from the date of the service upon the district attorney or the Attorney General of notice of the fact that a resolution or ordinance was adopted by the governing body of the county, municipality, or other political subdivision authorizing the issuance of refunding bonds, the district attorney or the Attorney General shall prepare and file a petition in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the county, municipality, or other political subdivision desiring to issue refunding bonds is located, directed to the superior court of the county, in the name of the state, and against the county, municipality, or political subdivision desiring to issue refunding bonds under the resolution or ordinance. The petition shall set forth the service of the notice, the name of the county, municipality, or political subdivision seeking to issue the refunding bonds, the maximum principal amount of the refunding bonds to be issued, the interest rate or rates which the bonds are to bear, and also setting forth the principal amount of outstanding bonded indebtedness to be refunded, the amount of principal to be paid in each year over the remaining life of the bonds to be refunded, the interest rate or rates per annum said outstanding bonds which are to be refunded bear and a certified copy of the resolution or ordinance so adopted authorizing the issuance of the refunding bonds shall be attached to the petition and made a part thereof. The petition, in lieu of specifying the rate or rates of interest which the refunding bonds are to bear, may state that the refunding bonds when issued will bear interest at a rate or rates not exceeding a maximum rate per annum. The district attorney or the Attorney General shall obtain, from the judge of the court, an order requiring the county, municipality, or political subdivision, by its proper officers, to appear at such time and place, either in term or at chambers, within 20 days from the filing of the petition, as the judge of the court may direct, and to show cause, if any exists, why the refunding bonds should not be confirmed and validated. The petition and order shall be served in the manner provided by law for the service of petitions upon counties, municipalities, or political subdivisions. The officers of the county, municipality, or political subdivision shall make sworn answers to such petition at or before the date set in the order for the hearing.

History

(Ga. L. 1897, p. 82, § 2; Civil Code 1910, § 446; Ga. L. 1920, p. 63, § 2; Code 1933, § 87-302; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1034, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 168, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1362, § 6.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1984, p. 1362, § 8, not codified by the General Assembly, provided: "The provisions of this Act [which amended this Code section] shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof, and insofar as the provisions of this Act may be inconsistent with the provisions of the Georgia Constitution under circumstances where the General Assembly has been granted the power by law to enlarge or restrict such provisions of the Constitution or the provisions of any law, including any general, local, or special Act of the General Assembly creating or activating any municipality, this Act shall control."

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Provision for time of hearing directory. - Provision of this section, which prescribes the time within which the judge of the superior court shall fix the hearing on the petition to validate an issue of municipal bonds, and the time within which the judge shall hear and determine the same is directory only. Spencer v. City of Columbus, 150 Ga. 312, 103 S.E. 464 (1920); Perkins v. Norristown (42) Sch. Dist., 151 Ga. 414, 107 S.E. 42 (1921).

Provision as to time of filing petition mandatory. - Provision requiring the solicitor general (now district attorney) to file the petition within 20 days from date of service upon the solicitor general (now district attorney) was not merely directory, but mandatory. Roff v. Town of Calhoun, 110 Ga. 806, 36 S.E. 214 (1900).

No right to file petition after 20 days. - Solicitor general (now district attorney) has no authority, after the expiration of 20 days from the date of the service upon the solicitor general (now district attorney) of the notice provided for by Ga. L. 1987, p. 82, § 1 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-82-20), relating to "the confirming and validating of" bonds, to file the petition prescribed by Ga. L. 1987, p. 82, § 2 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-82-21), and such a petition, if filed too late, cannot be made the basis of any valid judicial action. Roff v. Town of Calhoun, 110 Ga. 806, 36 S.E. 214 (1900).

Sufficiency of petition. - It is necessary, of course, to state the facts, and this should be done with sufficient particularity to meet the requirements of good pleading. A petition which fails to show, except by a bare conclusion, that the election resulted prima facie in favor of the issuance of the bonds is fatally defective and subject to general demurrer (now motion to dismiss). Edwards v. City of Clarkesville, 35 Ga. App. 306, 133 S.E. 45 (1926).

Necessary elements in petition. - Petition to validate bonds must show that an election was held pursuant to the provisions of Article 1 of this chapter and that the result of the election was prima facie in favor of issuance of the bonds. Lilly v. Crisp County Sch. Sys., 117 Ga. App. 868, 162 S.E.2d 456 (1968).

Unnecessary allegations. - Petition need not set out any details relating to the required number of voters. Spencer v. City of Clarkesville, 129 Ga. 627, 59 S.E. 274 (1907); Davis v. Orland Consol. Sch. Dist., 152 Ga. 76, 108 S.E. 466 (1921).

This section does not require that petition should allege that amount of bonds is within constitutional limitation as to the debt to be incurred by a municipal corporation or political division. Such matter, however, may be urged by an intervenor on the trial. If the intervenor should urge such matter, the burden is upon the intervenor to plead and prove the matter. Sewell v. City of Tallapoosa, 145 Ga. 19, 88 S.E. 577 (1916).

It is not necessary that a list of voters and tally sheets of an election should be set out in or attached to a petition. Stephens v. School Dist. No. 3, 154 Ga. 275, 114 S.E. 197 (1922).

Law does not require an allegation as to publication of the notice to the voters, or as to the furnishing of the list of the registered voters (it being sufficient merely to show the number of such voters), or as to the city's indebtedness not exceeding the limit allowed by the Constitution. Edwards v. City of Clarkesville, 35 Ga. App. 306, 133 S.E. 45 (1926).

Proceeding, brought by a solicitor general (now district attorney) to validate bonds to be issued by a school district in a county of this state, need only allege facts to meet the requirements of this section and it is therefore unnecessary that the solicitor general (now district attorney) allege that the school district was one "in which a local tax is now or may hereafter be levied for school purposes," or is a school district "in a county now levying a local tax." These matters are matters of defense to the validation proceeding. Hardrick v. State, 53 Ga. App. 299, 185 S.E. 577 (1936).

Misnomer of the municipality in petition to validate bonds does not vitiate judgment of confirmation, when it appears that the officers of the municipality acknowledged service of the petition and answered the petition under oath in its true corporate name, and the judgment of validation also sets forth the proper corporate name of the municipality. Rhodes v. City of Louisville, 121 Ga. 551, 49 S.E. 681 (1904).

Omission of statement of principal and interest from petition. - When the petition under this section omitted to state how much principal and interest was to be paid annually and when the bonds were to be paid in full, but no objection was made in that proceeding to the sufficiency of the petition, and attached to the answer of the city as an exhibit was a copy of the ordinance providing for the issuance of the bonds, which showed the facts referred to above, so that it appeared from the record that provision on that subject was made, after judgment of validation the omission of the allegation above mentioned from the petition of the solicitor general (now district attorney) will not serve to render the entire proceeding void, or to authorize an injunction to prevent the payment of the bonds. Thomas v. City of Blakely, 141 Ga. 488, 81 S.E. 218 (1914).

Issuance of order prior to filing petition. - Provisions of this section are satisfied if the notice is served and the petition is filed and the order nisi obtained within the several times specified, notwithstanding the issuance of the order nisi may have preceded the filing of the petition in the office of the clerk of the superior court. Durrence v. City of Statesboro, 147 Ga. 175, 93 S.E. 88 (1917).

Validation within jurisdiction of superior court. - Proceeding to validate bonds embraces justiciable questions within the jurisdiction of the superior court. Lilly v. Crisp County Sch. Sys., 117 Ga. App. 868, 162 S.E.2d 456 (1968).

Venue in county in which bonds are situated. - Venue of a statutory proceeding to validate municipal bonds is in the county in which the bonds are situated. Ray v. City of Lavonia, 141 Ga. 626, 81 S.E. 884 (1914); Murray v. City of Tifton, 143 Ga. 301, 84 S.E. 967 (1915).

Fixing of hearing in another county of circuit. - Under the provision of this section, touching the validation of bonds, that, on due application, the judge of the superior court shall require the proper officers to show cause, "at such time and place . . . as the judge of said court may direct, why said bonds should not be confirmed and validated," it was held that the fixing, by the judge, of the place for the hearing in another county of the judicial circuit than that where the election was held was not beyond the terms of the Act. Farmer v. Mayor of Thomson, 133 Ga. 94, 65 S.E. 180 (1909).

Hearing on day not named in notice. - When, prior to the hearing of a proceeding for the validation of county bonds under the provisions of this section the required statutory publication giving notice of the date of hearing has been duly made, the fact that the hearing was had before the judge on a day other than that named in the published notice does not render the judgment illegal, when it further appears that the case was regularly continued by the court from the day named in the publication to the day on which the hearing was had. Wimberly v. County of Twiggs, 116 Ga. 50, 42 S.E. 478 (1902); Moody v. Board of Comm'rs, 29 Ga. App. 21, 113 S.E. 103 (1922).

By whom notice given. - Petition was not subject to demurrer (now motion to dismiss) because the notice to the solicitor general (now district attorney) was not given by the proper officer. This notice must be given by the officer or officers charged with declaring the result of the election. Stephens v. School Dist. No. 3, 154 Ga. 275, 114 S.E. 197 (1922).

Burden of proof in action to validate bonds. - It was incumbent upon the petitioner in an action to validate bonds to make out a prima facie case by proving each of the substantial and material allegations set forth in former Civil Code 1910, §§ 445 and 446 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-82-20 and 36-82-21) as necessary allegations of the petition. When this was done the burden was cast upon the defendant, or upon a proper party as intervenor, to set up and establish any other fact which by aliunde proof would render the bond election invalid. King v. County Bd. of Educ., 42 Ga. App. 563, 156 S.E. 710 (1931), aff'd by operation of law, 174 Ga. 685, 164 S.E. 52 (1932).

Burden is on state to prove material facts which are requisite to obtain validation. Lilly v. Crisp County Sch. Sys., 117 Ga. App. 868, 162 S.E.2d 456 (1968).

When unqualified trustees act as de facto officers. - When a school district is divided by the board of education of the county by proper resolution, and no new trustees are elected or qualified for that district from which another district is created, but the trustees of the original district continue to act therefor, and call an election for the purpose of determining whether bonds will be issued for the purpose of building and equipping a schoolhouse, and the election results in favor of the bonds, and the trustees give the proper notice to the solicitor (now district attorney), the trustees are acting in the matter as de facto officers and the trustees' acts cannot be attacked as null and void in the proceeding to validate the bonds. Hardrick v. State, 53 Ga. App. 299, 185 S.E. 577 (1936).

Cited in King v. County Bd. of Educ., 174 Ga. 685, 164 S.E. 52 (1932); Lilly v. Crisp County Sch. Sys., 224 Ga. 45, 159 S.E.2d 707 (1968).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 355 et seq.

36-82-22. Notice of superior court hearing on show cause order.

Statute text

Prior to the hearing provided for in Code Section 36-82-21, the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the hearing is to be held shall publish in a newspaper, once during each of the two successive weeks immediately preceding the week in which the hearing is to be held, a notice to the public that on the day specified in the order providing for the hearing the same will be heard. Such newspaper shall be the official organ of the county in which the sheriff's advertisements appear.

History

(Ga. L. 1897, p. 82, § 6; Civil Code 1910, § 450; Code 1933, § 87-303; Ga. L. 1966, p. 76, § 1.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Editor's notes. - In light of the similarity of the statutory provisions, annotations decided under former Code 1933, § 87-302 are included in the annotations for this Code section.

Object of publication is to inform citizens, whose interests are to be affected, of the time when the case is set to be heard. Wimberly v. County of Twiggs, 116 Ga. 50, 42 S.E. 478 (1902).
